Utah statutes.
72-7-210.   Present ordinances or regulations may be stricter.

Nothing in this part affects the provisions of any lawful ordinance or regulation which is more restrictive than the provisions of this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

